eng_seg.twol
Alphabet
  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
  %{S%}:es %{S%}:s
  %>:0 %>:%>
;

Rules
"{S} z _ realisation"
%{S%}:zes <=> z %>: _ ;

"{S} es realisation"
%{S%}:es <=> s %>: _ ;
             x %>: _ ;
             c h %>: _ ;
             s h %>: _ ;
"> realisation"
%>:0 <=> _ .#.;
